Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2397.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 65-242 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
242. For the purpose of insuring ensuring that adequate public health
services are available to all inhabitants of the state of Kansas, the state
shall assist in the financing of the operation of local health departments.
Subject to appropriations therefor, state financial assistance shall be
distributed to local health departments as follows:
(a) First, each local health department shall, upon application
therefor, receive $7,000 $12,000. If sufficient funds are not available to
make this distribution, then the funds which that are available shall be
divided equally among those local health departments making application
therefor.
(b) Second, if any funds are available after the distribution required in
subsection (a), the secretary shall distribute such funds as follows:
(1) A figure equal to the total amount of state financial assistance
available for distribution, before deduction for the distribution in
subsection (a), shall be determined.
(2) The figure determined in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
allocated to local health departments making application for assistance
based on the proportion that the population of the county or counties
comprising the local health department applying for such assistance bears
to the total population of all counties comprising local health departments
which that have applied for such financial assistance.
(3) If any local health department making application for assistance
would receive receives an amount equal to or less than $7,000 $12,000
using the formula in paragraph (2) of this subsection, then such department
shall be paid in accordance with subsection (a) only. If any local health
department making application for assistance would receive receives more
than $7,000 $12,000 using the formula in paragraph (2) of this subsection,
then such department shall be paid based on the proportion that the
population served by the county or counties comprising such local health

HB 2397 2
department bears to the total population of all counties comprising local
health departments which that have made application for assistance,
except for departments receiving funds under subsection (a), except that in
no case shall the assistance distributed under this subsection (b) to a local
health department exceed the amount that the local health department
receives from local tax revenues for the county fiscal year in which the
state financial assistance is paid.
(c) If local tax revenues allotted to a local health department for a
fiscal year fall below the level of local tax revenues allotted to the local
health department for the preceding fiscal year, the amount of state
financial assistance under this act for which such local health department
is eligible for the fiscal year shall be reduced by a percentage equal to the
percentage of reduction in local tax revenue for that fiscal year.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 65-242 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.